Utah statutes.
23-21-6.   Acquisition of lands by United States for migratory bird refuges.

(1)  The consent of the state of Utah is given to acquisition by the United States of such areas of land or water in the state, as the United States may deem necessary, by and with the consent of the county legislative body of the county where the land or water are located and after approval of application, subject to the laws of the state of Utah for water rights, for the establishment and maintenance of migratory waterfowl refuges in accordance with and for the purpose of the Act of Congress approved February 18, 1929, entitled "Migratory Bird Conservation Act" as amended and the Act of Congress approved March 16, 1935, entitled "Migratory Bird Hunting Stamp Act," as amended; and the same may be used by the United States as refuge for migratory birds, reserving, however, to the state of Utah jurisdiction, both civil and criminal, of persons upon the areas so acquired except so far as the punishment of offenses against the United States are concerned.

(2)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose under the state or any agency of it any obligation to convey to the United States any interest in land or water owned or controlled by the state, except upon appropriate terms and for adequate consideration. The reservation to the state of coal and other minerals in lands sold by it within areas so established and easements retained by the state to prospect for, mine, and remove the same are declared to be subject to rules and regulations prescribed from time to time by the Secretary of the Interior for the occupation, use, operation, protection, and administration of these areas as refuges for migratory birds.

